Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska52-1411
Bankruptcy; effect.

The filing of a petition for relief under any bankruptcy law of the United States shall render any unperformed letter of commitment under sections 52-1401 to 52-1408 null and void.

Laws 1987, LB 101, § 11.